Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) An additive omnibus transportation budget of the state is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final judgments arising out of such activities, for the period ending June 30, 2027.(2) Except as otherwise provided in this act, it is the intent of the legislature that the funding levels specified in LEAP Transportation Document NL-2025-A as developed March 24, 2025, represents a commitment to provide appropriations to the agencies, programs, and activities at the amounts identified therein through fiscal year 2031.(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act.(a) "Fiscal year 2026" or "FY 2026" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.(b) "Fiscal year 2027" or "FY 2027" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.(f) "Reappropriation" means appropriation and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, is subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations.(g) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.2025-2027 FISCAL BIENNIUMGENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIESâOPERATINGNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 101. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,186,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 102. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUEMove Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$100,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation costs associated with chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. ---- (S-2391.3/25)), Laws of 2025 (transportation resources). If chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. ---- (S-2391.3/25)), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this section lapses.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 103. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$900,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,300,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$8,200,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) $7,300,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the University of Washington's sidewalk inventory and accessibility mapping project to develop a public dataset under an open license and develop the tools needed to publish that data according to an open data specification. The project must include, but is not limited to, utilization of existing data sources, imagery, detailed surveys, and manually collected, detailed data for city streets, county rural and urban local access roads and collectors/arterials, state roads of all types, and roads owned by other entities. The project may draw on partially developed sidewalk data for all state facilities. To the extent practicable, the final product must be suitable for use by the department of transportation, local and regional agencies, tribal governments, and the general public. A project status report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature on December 1st of each year until the work is completed.(2) $900,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington State transportation center to continue the WSDOT-UW professional master's degree fellowship program with 12 fellows, expand department of transportation engineering internships to 20 interns, and to encourage more students to consider careers in transportation, engineering, and related fields.TRANSPORTATION AGENCIESâOPERATINGNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 201. FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSIONHighway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,700,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $600,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commission to purchase telematics data from a qualified vendor that provides anonymized information on vehicle speeds and driver behaviors, such as hard braking, on a statewide basis and in selected geographical areas based upon demographic characteristics and crash history. The commission must provide an annual report summarizing findings from the telematics data to the transportation committees of the legislature beginning by June 30, 2025, and until June 30, 2027.(2) $2,000,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement a multifaceted approach to supplement existing funding targeted at impaired driving and other enforcement. The areas of emphasis expected to be funded include additional high visibility enforcement and indigenous knowledge-informed tribal traffic safety support. Funding is also provided for the commission to administer and provide oversight of these activities. The commission must provide a preliminary report to the transportation committees of the legislature on these funded activities and any outcome information by December 1, 2025, with a final report due by December 1, 2026.(3) $1,100,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the tribal traffic safety coordinator program under chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5374)(including tribal representation in certain transportation activities). If chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5374) is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 202. FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARDMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,500,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $2,500,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant program to assist counties and cities with the costs associated with obtaining a new federal highway administration load rating for bridges to accommodate legal loads as authorized under RCW 46.44.041.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 203. FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEEMove Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 204. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$23,980,000Highway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,178,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$26,158,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $3,644,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for administrative costs, advertising, outreach, and bonus payments associated with developing and implementing a state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program for the purpose of recruiting and filling vacant trooper positions in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The legislature is committed to continuing the state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program until the vacancy levels are significantly reduced from current levels. The recruitment, advertising, and outreach associated with this program must continue efforts to create a more diverse workforce and must also provide an accelerated pathway for joining the state patrol for high quality individuals who have previously been employed as a general authority peace officer.(b) The state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program must include:(i) Thorough hiring procedures to ensure that only the highest quality candidates are selected as cadets and as lateral hires, including extensive review of past law enforcement employment history through extensive reference checks, Brady list identification, and any other issues that may impact the performance, credibility, and integrity of the individual.(ii) An accelerated training program for lateral hires from other agencies that recognizes the knowledge and experience of candidates previously employed in law enforcement; and(iii) A sign-on bonus for each trooper hired through the expedited recruitment incentive program as follows:(A) $5,000 for each cadet after completion of the Washington state patrol academy;(B) $5,000 for each successful graduating cadet after completion of a one-year probation period;(C) $8,000 for each lateral hire after completion of the accelerated training program for lateral hires;(D) $6,000 for each lateral hire after completion of a one-year probation period; and(E) $6,000 for each lateral hire after completion of two years of service.(c) The expenditures on the state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program are contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section.(d) For the purposes of this subsection:(i) "Cadet" means a person employed for the express purpose of receiving the on-the-job training required for attendance at the Washington state patrol academy and for becoming a commissioned trooper.(ii) "Lateral hire" means an eligible employee previously employed as a general authority peace officer.(2) $1,668,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for accelerated training programs for lateral hires.(3) $2,178,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue the bonus policy for commissioned staff who reach 26 or more years of service in the Washington state retirement system pursuant to chapter 237, Laws of 2024.(4) $5,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to enhance the vehicle replacement cycle for higher mileage vehicles in the agency's fleet.(5) $5,500,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for updates and improvements to the agency's wide area and local area network systems and for additional information technology staff positions to address increased workload and address backlogs.(6) $3,500,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for overtime and other costs associated with mitigating negative impacts of staff vacancies on agency operations.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 205. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSINGHighway Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,634,000Driver Education Safety Improvement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,899,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$100,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$10,633,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $3,870,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement digital driver's license capability on mobile phones for individuals wishing to have this functionality in addition to the physical standard driver's license. In the first phase, the digital driver's license must be made available by configuring the necessary interfaces with native wallet systems. The amounts provided in this subsection may be used to provide resources to implement an extensive external communications plan regarding the digital driver's license option for drivers.(2) $2,000,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue the DOL2Go program, bringing driver licensing and identicard services to underrepresented and rural communities.(3) $464,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department's costs to provide an interagency transfer to the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth to continue efforts to make driver training education more accessible for deaf and hard of hearing youth in the state.(4) $300,000 of the highway safety accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional actions in accordance with the recently completed evaluation of ways to implement an older and medically at-risk driver program.(5) The entire move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation costs associated with chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. ---- (S-2391.3/25)), Laws of 2025 (transportation resources). If chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. ---- (S-2391.3/25)), Laws of 2025 is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.(6) The entire driver education safety improvement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5695), Laws of 2025 (young driver safety) or chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1878), Laws of 2025 (young driver safety). If neither chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5695), Laws of 2025 or chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1878), Laws of 2025 are enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 206. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâINFORMATION TECHNOLOGYâPROGRAM CMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$11,970,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 207. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâFACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND CONSTRUCTIONâPROGRAM DâOPERATINGMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,000,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $7,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the department for staffing and other actions associated with keeping facility assets in a state of good repair.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION EQUIPMENT FUNDâPROGRAM EMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,500,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department's costs related to replacing obsolete transportation equipment and replacing fuel sites. Beginning December 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the department must provide a report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the current progress on replacing obsolete equipment, progress towards reaching a level purchasing state, and the status of a fuel site replacement prioritization plan. The report must also include:(1) A list of department-owned and managed fuel sites prioritized by urgency of replacement;(2) A status report on the installation and use of fuel site infrastructure that can support zero emission vehicles; and(3) A description of action steps taken in the use of nonappropriated transportation equipment fund resources to maximize the replacement of obsolete equipment and reduce the growing fund balance, including specific modifications to equipment purchasing behavior to increase deployment in the field.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORTâPROGRAM HMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,403,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 210. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâHIGHWAY MAINTENANCEâPROGRAM MMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$83,700,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Within amounts provided in this section, the department must work to bring the condition and performance of pavement markings on major corridors into alignment with state and federal targets.(2) $8,254,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for maintenance and operations activities to help keep people and goods moving during the 2026 World Cup. These activities include, but are not limited to, graffiti and litter removal, encampment mitigation, landscaping, rest area maintenance, roadway cleanup, and incident response team staffing.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 211. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRAFFIC OPERATIONSâPROGRAM QMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,861,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$13,861,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $7,811,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or provide congestion relief. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all low-cost enhancement projects completed in the prior fiscal biennium.(2) $5,000,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to address emergent issues related to safety for pedestrians and bicyclists. Funds may only be spent after approval from the office of financial management. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all emergent issues addressed in the prior fiscal biennium.(3) $1,050,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Washington's share of efforts to mitigate collision risk at the Lewis and Clark and Astoria-Megler bridges, including a vessel collision risk assessment, installation of an air gap sensor, and expansion of the virtual coordination center.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 212. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORTâPROGRAM SMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,218,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 213. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâTRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCHâPROGRAM TMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$13,257,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) $10,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Interstate 5 planning consistent with section 219(2), chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5161) (omnibus transportation appropriations). $1,250,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for an assessment of Interstate 5 on-ramps in the core area of the interstate system from the Pierce county line in Federal Way to state route number 531/Smokey Point boulevard in Arlington to evaluate installing new meters or revising high occupancy vehicle bypasses at existing meters and prioritize locations for ramp meter installations or high occupancy vehicle bypass conversions.(2) $1,500,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a corridor vision and implementation plan that identifies improvement options to address safety and multimodal mobility needs on the state route number 164 corridor from Dogwood Street East in Auburn to High Point Street in Enumclaw. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature with recommended safety and multimodal infrastructure improvements by June 30, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 214. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPUBLIC TRANSPORTATIONâPROGRAM VMove Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$11,923,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $10,000,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for intercity bus expansion in preparation for the 2026 World Cup. The department must report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management annually on each January 15th with expansion status and performance updates.(2) $1,225,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for support of Intercity Transit route 14.(3) $350,000 of the move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Key Peninsula rural transportation program.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 215. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâMARINEâPROGRAM XPuget Sound Ferry Operations AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$14,650,000Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,210,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$22,860,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,600,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for winter service enhancements in the San Juan Islands. By December 1, 2026, the department must report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management impacts of the service increase including, but not limited to, ridership impacts, service reliability, and whether service changes have induced permanent relocation of workforce serving San Juan Island routes.(2) $11,990,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation and $8,210,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to increase deck and engine positions across the system, prioritizing positions that will mitigate crew related cancellations and reduce overtime expenditures. The department must consider data related to staffing cancellations, as well as current and forecasted staffing levels of deck and engine positions, and mitigation for job classes with the highest overtime costs when adding positions. Funds provided in this subsection are eligible to be used for all deck or engine job classes. The department must include an update on the number of positions hired by job class as part of the annual performance report.(3) $60,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for support of a United States Coast Guard-compliant basic safety program with Crawford nautical training.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 216. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâLOCAL PROGRAMSâPROGRAM ZMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$500,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $500,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the U-District Partnership, in coordination with the Lid I-5 North Coalition, the city of Seattle, and United States department of transportation, to conduct a North Seattle I-5 Lid feasibility study.TRANSPORTATION AGENCIESâCAPITALNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 301. FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARDMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$20,000,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional complete streets program grant awards to cities and counties for planning, design, and infrastructure related to making roadways accessible for driving, walking, cycling, transit, and aesthetic qualities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 302. FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARDMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$20,000,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a new county local road grant program for the preservation and improvement of county local roads that are not currently eligible under existing funding programs.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 303. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâFACILITIESâPROGRAM Dâ(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)âCAPITALMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,800,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $800,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to improve its ability to keep facility assets in a state of good repair. In using the funds appropriated in this subsection, the department, with periodic reporting to the joint transportation committee, must continue to develop and implement a prioritization of facility capital preservation needs and repair projects.(2) $3,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct master planning on highest and best use of the Corson Ave regional headquarters property, including options to reduce space and footprint on the property, examining the commercial value of the property if converted to other use or sale of a portion of the property, and reviewing alternative financing methods to fund improvements.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 304. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâIMPROVEMENTSâPROGRAM IMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$975,929,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the entire move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the state highway projects and activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2025 NL-1 as developed March 24, 2025.(2) $45,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Safety Projects (L2021221). These amounts must be held in unallotted status. The legislature intends to provide $700,000,000 over a six-year period for the eligible safety projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2025 NL-2 as developed March 24, 2025. The legislature further intends to fund strategies identified pursuant to section 217(10), chapter 310, Laws of 2024, including on direct access ramps. The department of transportation is directed, as part of its 2026 supplemental budget submittal, to provide recommended aging and phasing for each of the eligible projects consistent with the six transportation policy goals in RCW 47.04.280.(3) $50,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Move Ahead WA Project Completion (L2021222). These amounts must be held in unallotted status. The legislature intends to provide $1,100,000,000 over a six-year period for the eligible move ahead WA completion projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2025 NL-2 as developed March 24, 2025, and for the projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2022 NL-1 as developed March 9, 2022. The department of transportation is directed, as part of its 2026 supplemental budget submittal, to provide recommended aging and phasing for each of the eligible projects consistent with the six transportation policy goals in RCW 47.04.280.(4)(a) $37,322,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the SR 3 Freight Corridor (T30400R) project. The legislature intends to provide a total of $78,910,000 for this project, including an increase of $12,000,000 in future biennia to safeguard against inflation and supply/labor interruptions and ensure that:(i) The northern terminus remains at Lake Flora Road and the southern terminus at the intersection of state route number 3 and state route number 302; and(ii) Multimodal safety improvements at the southern terminus remain in the project to provide connections to North Mason school district and provide safe routes to schools.(b) With respect to right-of-way acquisition and the construction of the SR 3 Freight Corridor project (T30400R), tribal consultation with the Suquamish tribe must begin at the earliest stage of planning, including, without limitation, on all funding decisions and funding programs, to provide a government-to-government mechanism for the tribe to evaluate, identify, and expressly notify governmental entities of any potential impacts to tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which the tribe possesses rights reserved or protected by federal treaty, statute, or executive order. The consultation is independent of, and in addition to, any public participation process required under state law, or by a state agency, including the requirements of Executive Order 21-02 related to archaeological and cultural resources, and regardless of whether the agency receives a request for consultation from the Suquamish tribe. Regularly scheduled tribal consultation meetings with the Suquamish tribe shall continue throughout the duration of any funding or program decisions and proposed project approval.(5) $30,007,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the SR 3/Gorst Area - Widening project (L4000017).(a) $7,500,000 of this amount is provided solely for low-cost enhancements that complement the long-term improvement alternatives identified through planning work on the corridor.(b) Tribal consultation with the Suquamish tribe must begin at the earliest stage of planning, including, without limitation, all funding decisions and funding programs, to provide a government-to-government mechanism for the tribe to evaluate, identify, and expressly notify governmental entities of any potential impacts to tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which the tribe possesses rights reserved or protected by federal treaty, statute, or executive order. The consultation is independent of, and in addition to, any public participation process required under state law, or by a state agency, including the requirements of Executive Order 21-02 related to archaeological and cultural resources, and regardless of whether the agency receives a request for consultation from the Suquamish tribe. Regularly scheduled tribal consultation meetings with the Suquamish tribe must continue throughout the duration of any funding program and proposed project approval.(6) $373,467,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the US 395 North Spokane Corridor project (M00800R). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $300,000 is provided solely for an environmental justice assessment to determine if traffic noise abatement will reduce environmental harm to the East Central Neighborhood as a result of this project.(7) $17,193,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the SR 522/Paradise Lk Rd Interchange & Widening on SR 522 (Design/Engineering) project (NPARADI), specifically for design of, preliminary engineering, and right-of-way acquisition for the interchange and widening as a single project. The department must consider reserving portions of state route number 522, including designated lanes or ramps, for the exclusive or preferential use of public transportation vehicles, privately owned buses, motorcycles, private motor vehicles carrying not less than a specified number of passengers, or private transportation provider vehicles pursuant to RCW 47.52.025.(8) The move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation includes up to $975,929,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in section 1, chapter . . ., (Senate Bill No. ---- (S-2371.1/25)), Laws of 2025).(9) It is the intent of the legislature to provide $833,000 in move ahead WA accountâstate funds in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium and a total of $4,000,000 in move ahead WA accountâstate funds in the 2029-2031 fiscal biennium for the Rural Roadway Departures Extension project (L2021224) and that the lists referenced in subsection (1) of this section and section 1(2) of this act be updated accordingly.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 305. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPRESERVATIONâPROGRAM PMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$300,000,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $200,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional highway preservation (L2021219). $1,626,000 of this amount is provided solely to address emerging needs along Interstate 90 between North Bend and Vantage to help keep people and goods moving during the 2026 World Cup.(2) $100,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for highway preservation on state highway locations in population centers, including locations within cities subject to RCW 47.24.020, with high safety risks based on the department's vulnerable road user safety assessment prepared as required under federal law (L2021220).(3) The move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation includes up to $300,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in section 1, chapter . . ., (Senate Bill No. ---- (S-2371.1/25)), Laws of 2025).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 306. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâPUBLIC TRANSPORTATIONâPROGRAM VMove Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$40,000,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2025 NL-1 as developed March 24, 2025.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 307. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâWASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTIONâPROGRAM WMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$40,000,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The entire move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2025 NL-1 as developed March 24, 2025.(2) The move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation includes up to $40,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in section 1, chapter . . ., (Senate Bill No. ---- (S-2371.1/25)), Laws of 2025).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâRAILâPROGRAM YMove Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$25,200,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2025 NL-1 as developed March 24, 2025.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 309. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONâLOCAL PROGRAMSâPROGRAM ZMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$69,206,000Move Ahead WA Flexible AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$65,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$134,206,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The entire move ahead WA flexible accountâstate appropriation and move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document 2025 NL-1 as developed March 24, 2025.(2) The move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation includes up to $33,550,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in section 1, chapter . . ., (Senate Bill No. ---- (S-2371.1/25)), Laws of 2025).(3) $1,000,000 of the move ahead WA accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Reducing Rural Roadway Departures Program (L2021122). It is the intent of the legislature to provide $1,500,000 in move ahead WA accountâstate funds in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium and a total of $6,000,000 in move ahead WA accountâstate funds in the 2029-2031 fiscal biennium for this project and that the lists referenced in subsection (1) of this section and section 1(2) of this act be updated accordingly.TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 401. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUEMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,747,000Highway Bond Retirement AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$42,311,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$49,058,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 402. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGESMove Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,349,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 403. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS(1) Highway Safety AccountâState Appropriation: Fortransfer to the Move Ahead WA AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000(2) Highway Safety AccountâState Appropriation: Fortransfer to the Move Ahead WA FlexibleAccountâState. . . .$61,500,000(3) Capital Vessel Replacement AccountâStateAppropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WAAccountâState. . . .$10,763,000(4) Move Ahead WA AccountâState Appropriation: Fortransfer to the Tacoma Narrows Toll BridgeAccountâState. . . .$26,000,000MISCELLANEOUSSec. 501. RCW 46.68.060 and 2023 c 472 s 705 are each amended to read as follows:There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as the highway safety fund to the credit of which must be deposited all moneys directed by law to be deposited therein. This fund must be used for carrying out the provisions of law relating to driver licensing, driver improvement, financial responsibility, cost of furnishing abstracts of driving records and maintaining such case records, and to carry out the purposes set forth in RCW 43.59.010, chapters 46.72 and 46.72A RCW, and RCW 47.04.410. During the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the highway safety fund to the multimodal transportation account and the state patrol highway account. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the highway safety fund to the move ahead WA account and the move ahead WA flexible account.Sec. 502. RCW 47.60.322 and 2023 c 472 s 715 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The capital vessel replacement account is created in the motor vehicle account. All revenues generated from the vessel replacement surcharge under RCW 47.60.315(7) and service fees collected by the department of licensing or county auditor or other agent appointed by the director under RCW 46.17.040, 46.17.050, and 46.17.060 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the construction or purchase of ferry vessels and to pay the principal and interest on bonds authorized for the construction or purchase of ferry vessels. However, expenditures from the account must first be used to support the construction or purchase, including any applicable financing costs, of a ferry vessel with a carrying capacity of at least ((one hundred forty-four))144 cars.(2) The state treasurer may transfer moneys from the capital vessel replacement account to the transportation 2003 account (nickel account) for debt service on bonds issued for the construction of 144-car class ferry vessels.(3) The legislature may transfer from the capital vessel replacement account to the connecting Washington account created under RCW 46.68.395 such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the capital vessel replacement account to be used for ferry terminal construction and preservation.(4) During the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the capital vessel replacement account to the transportation partnership account and the connecting Washington account.(5) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys from the capital vessel replacement account to the move ahead WA account.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 503. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 504. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---